Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2713.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 126C.17, subdivision 9b, is amended to read: Subd. 9b. Renewal by school board. (a) Notwithstanding the election requirements of subdivision 9, a school board may renew an expiring referendum by board action if: (1) the per pupil amount of the referendum is the same as the amount expiring, or for an expiring referendum that was adjusted annually by the rate of inflation, the same as the per pupil amount of the expiring referendum, adjusted annually for inflation in the same manner as if the expiring referendum had continued; (2) the term of the renewed referendum is no longer than the initial term approved by the voters; (3) the school board, having taken a recorded vote, has adopted a written resolution authorizing the renewal after holding a meeting and allowing public testimony on the proposed renewal; and (4) the expiring referendum has not been previously renewed under this subdivision. (b) The resolution must be adopted by the school board deleted text begin bydeleted text end new text begin on or after July 1 of the second fiscal year prior to the fiscal year in which the referendum expires, but no later thannew text end June 15 of deleted text begin any calendar year anddeleted text end new text begin the fiscal year prior to the fiscal year in which the referendum expires. The resolutionnew text end becomes effective 60 days after its adoption. (c) A referendum expires in the last fiscal year in which the referendum generates revenue for the school district. deleted text begin A school board may renew an expiring referendum under this subdivision not more than two fiscal years before the referendum expires.deleted text end (d) A district renewing an expiring referendum under this subdivision must submit a copy of the adopted resolution to the commissioner and to the county auditor no later than deleted text begin September 1deleted text end new text begin August 15new text end of the deleted text begin calendar year in which the written resolution is adopteddeleted text end new text begin fiscal year prior to the fiscal year in which the referendum expiresnew text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively from June 16, 2024, and applies to school board resolutions adopted on or after that date. new text end